Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1802
Permit; Department of Health and Human Services, authority; certification to State Veterinarian.

The Department of Health and Human Services is hereby authorized to issue permits for the use of the pathogenic microorganisms described in section 71-1801 in the prevention or control of diseases in humans, if in the opinion of the department there is sufficient warrant for their utilization for such purpose. The department shall certify to the State Veterinarian the materials or substances that contain live microorganisms which are pathogenic to humans. The department is further authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

Laws 1943, c. 153, § 2, p. 562;

R.S.1943, § 71-1802;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 579;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 494.